Hawaii statutes.
§486-51 Applicability. (a) Petroleum
products accounting and the measurement requirements herein shall apply to the
blending, charging, dealing, dispensing, distributing, exchanging, exporting,
handling, importing, labeling, loading, manufacturing, marketing, measuring,
packaging, piping, processing, reprocessing, producing, refining, or
re-refining, retailing, selling, transporting, taxing, or wholesaling, or to
any of the variant forms of the above or to the person, equipment,
measurements, and calculations incident to such actions or activities involving
petroleum products.

(b) Petroleum products inspection shall apply
to all petroleum products kept, offered, or exposed for sales. [L 1988, c 156,
pt of §3; am L 1991, c 153, §20]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next